Wisconsin, session 2025, SB883.
do enact as follows:SB883,13Section 1. 103.66 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB883,2,24103.66 (1) (c) Permit the employment of a minor 16 years of age or over to 1operate a pizza-dough roller in the course of employment if the safeguards described 2in 29 CFR 570.62 (b) (2) are met and the following conditions apply:SB883,2,431. The design of the pizza-dough roller prevents fingers, hands, and clothing 4from being caught in the pizza-dough rollers.SB883,2,552. The gears of the pizza-dough roller are completely enclosed.SB883,2,763. The machine has microswitches that disengage the machinery if the backs 7or sides of the pizza-dough rollers are removed.SB883,2,984. All safeguards described in subds. 1. to 3. are present on the machine and 9operational and have not been overridden.SB883,2,11105. The minor does not set up, adjust, repair, oil, or clean the pizza-dough 11roller.SB883,2,1212